Arkansas, session 2025, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative study of
workforce and social services reform — Findings — Scope — Requirements.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas needs an educated and skilled workforce for
employment in diverse occupations and industries;
(2) The Arkansas workforce is increasingly in need of access to
higher quality education and training programs aligned to the growing
technological competencies required in occupations;
(3) Arkansas's public workforce system is a maze of confusing
programs and is not meeting the challenges faced by employers and workers;
(4) Arkansas does not have a centralized location that includes
*JLL102*
01-22-2025 10:51:23 JLL102

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB50
a clearinghouse of the available public assistance programs, how to access
them, and eligibility requirements;
(5) The United States Congress is considering the
reauthorization of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, 29 U.S.C. §
3101 et seq., and new opportunities to grant states the ability to pilot
comprehensive innovation demonstration programs; and
(6) Research has shown that an integrated system of workforce
and social services more effectively supports the most vulnerable citizens in
escaping poverty through targeted support and work to achieve dignity and
self-sufficiency, which will not only lift individuals but also strengthen
Arkansas's economy.
(b)(1) The Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall meet to conduct a study of
issues related to the reform of the state's workforce and social services.
(2) Meetings for the purpose of conducting the study required
under this section shall be held at least one (1) time every three (3) months
but may occur more often at the call of the cochairs of the Hospital,
Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council.
(c)(1) The purpose of the study required under this section is to
study issues and ideas related to the reform of the state's workforce and
social services and to consider related legislation that may be necessary to
remedy any issues identified during the course of the study.
(2) The study required under this section shall include without
limitation a study of:
(A) State models for coordinating and fully integrating
workforce, social services, education, child care, and healthcare programs;
(B) Alternative approaches that the state should consider
to achieve improved outcomes in workforce and social service programs,
including without limitation:
(i) Programs of the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act, 29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq., including without limitation
oversight for an integrated regional services delivery system;
(ii) The unemployment insurance program;
(iii) Vocational rehabilitation programs;
(iv) The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
01-22-2025 10:51:23 JLL102

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB50
program;
(v) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
(vi) The Employment and Training Program for
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program recipients; and
(vii) The Child Care Assistance Program;
(C) Performance outcomes of various workforce programs,
including without limitation an analysis of the number of common participants
enrolled in multiple programs across state agencies;
(D) The creation of an asset map that incorporates office
locations, case management systems, and customer intake and eligibility
procedures for the services and programs studied under this section; and
(E) Legislation that may be necessary to address any
issues identified in the course of the study conducted under this section.
(d) The Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council may form work groups to focus on
specific issues or topics as needed.
(e) In conducting the study required under this section, the Hospital,
Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council may include and consider input from subject matter
experts, who may be used to facilitate meetings, conduct research, or provide
technical assistance.
(f)(1)(A) On or before October 1, 2026, the Hospital, Medicaid, and
Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of the Legislative Council
shall file with the cochairs of the Legislative Council a final written
report of the activities, findings, and recommendations of the Hospital,
Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council under this section, including any draft legislation.
(B) Upon adoption of the final written report filed under
subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section, the Legislative Council shall submit a
copy of the adopted final written report to the Governor, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(2) The final written report required under subdivision (f)(1)
of this section shall:
(A) Contain recommendations for the integration of the
services and programs considered during the study, including without
limitation any state department or agency reorganizations needed to achieve
01-22-2025 10:51:23 JLL102

As Engrossed: S1/22/25 SB50
desired outcomes for the people of Arkansas; and
(B) Address the following key components:
(i) How current services and programs are organized
and administered at the state agency level;
(ii) A vision for how service delivery can be
integrated for the benefit of all Arkansans who rely on the services and
programs studied, including without limitation services and programs
delivered at the state, regional, and local levels;
(iii) Opportunities for financial integration and
efficient methods for allocating costs across multiple services and programs;
(iv) Recommendations on how supportive services,
such as child care, trauma recovery, and health insurance, can better support
employment outcomes;
(v) Identification of efficiencies leading to cost
savings that can be used for enhanced services, such as increased resource
availability for Arkansans to access education and training; and
(vi) Identification of opportunities for Arkansas to
participate in any federally authorized workforce demonstration project,
including without limitation provisions requiring waiver requests.
(g) During the course of the study required under this section, the
Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall provide updates to the
Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council related to efforts by the United States Congress to
reauthorize and reform the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, 29
U.S.C. § 3101 et seq., including without limitation opportunities to
incorporate recommendations contained within the final report through new
demonstration and waiver authority or other changes to current federal laws.
(h) The study required under this section expires on December 31,
2026.

/s/J. Boyd





01-22-2025 10:51:23 JLL102